Utah statutes.
58-56-13.   Modular units.
Modular unit construction, set-up, issuance of permits for construction or
set-up, and set-up shall be in accordance with the following:
(1)  construction and set-up shall be in accordance with the building
standards adopted pursuant to Section 58-56-4, or equivalent standards adopted
by rule;
(2)  the responsibility and authority for plan review and issuance of permits
for construction, modification, or set-up shall be that of the local regulator
of the political subdivision in which the modular unit is to be set-up;
(3)  the inspection of the construction, modification of, or set-up of a
modular unit to determine conformance with the provisions of this chapter and
the issuance of approvals shall be the responsibility of the local regulator
in the political subdivision in which the modular unit is to be set-up or is
set-up; and
(4)  nothing in this section shall preclude a local regulator from contracting
with a qualified third party for the inspection or plan review provided in
this section, or the state from entering into an interstate compact for third
party inspection of the construction of modular units.
